Louisiana, session 2026, HB57.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2135(A)(introductory paragraph), (B), and (D) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2135. Temporary restraining order
A. Upon good cause shown in an ex parte proceeding, the court may enter
a temporary restraining order, without bond, as it deems necessary to protect from
abuse the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be an incompetent.
Any person who shows immediate and present danger of abuse shall constitute good
cause for purposes of this Subsection. The court shall consider any and all past
history of abuse, or threats thereof, in determining the existence of an immediate and
present danger of abuse. There is no requirement that the abuse itself be recent,
immediate, or present. The court, on its own motion, may also obtain and consider
any and all past criminal history of the parties. The order may include but is not
limited to the following:
* * *
B. If a temporary restraining order is granted without notice, the matter shall
be set within twenty-one days for a rule to show cause why the protective order
should not be issued, at which time the petitioner must prove the allegations of abuse
by a preponderance of the evidence. If any criminal history has been considered, the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 57 ENROLLED
affected party shall be given the opportunity to rebut and to respond to the evidence
used in the underlying proceeding. The defendant shall be given notice of the
temporary restraining order and the hearing on the rule to show cause by service of
process as required by law within twenty-four hours of the issuance of the order.
* * *
D. If no temporary restraining order has been granted, the court shall issue
a rule to show cause why the protective order should not be issued, and set the rule
for hearing on the earliest day that the business of the court will permit, but in any
case within ten days from the date of service of the petition, at which time the
petitioner must prove the allegations of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence.
If any criminal history has been considered, the affected party shall be given the
opportunity to rebut and to respond to the evidence used in the underlying
proceeding. The defendant shall be given notice by service of process as required
by law.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.